lexc/noun/enhuoa.lexc
!!!enhuoa.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols  +Noun[gcat]

+Dis +Ess +Soc +Tem +Pref+
+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl
      
+Abl +Acc[lfea] +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub +Sup +Ter
      
§uue§ §J§ §UUE§ §OEOE§ §JP§ §AE§ §OEOE2§
§UUE1§ §oooe§ §AAA§ §oeoe§ §AA§ §oeoez§ §AE1§  §b§ §h§ §k§ §n§ §r§ §t§ §Jnull§ §JPnull§
§VV§   §ooez13§ §EOA2§ §OEOE11§ §oeoez12§ §oeoez11§ §oeoez1§
§oeoez2§
      
LEXICON Root
Noun ;
Prefigekoto;

LEXICON Prefigekoto
+Pref+:keresztül   Noun2;
+Pref+:kölcsön   Noun2;
+Pref+:széjjel   Noun2;
+Pref+:szembe   Noun2;
+Pref+:szerte   Noun2;
+Pref+:vissza   Noun2;
+Pref+:helyre   Noun2;
+Pref+:tovább   Noun2;
+Pref+:tönkre   Noun2;
+Pref+:észre   Noun2;
+Pref+:rajta   Noun2;
+Pref+:előre   Noun2;
+Pref+:félbe   Noun2;
+Pref+:félre   Noun2;
+Pref+:felül   Noun2;
+Pref+:fölül   Noun2;
+Pref+:agyon   Noun2;
+Pref+:ellen   Noun2;
+Pref+:körbe   Noun2;
+Pref+:körül   Noun2;
+Pref+:közbe   Noun2;
+Pref+:közre   Noun2;
+Pref+:külön   Noun2;
+Pref+:utána   Noun2;
+Pref+:végbe   Noun2;
+Pref+:végig   Noun2;
+Pref+:hátra   Noun2;
+Pref+:hozzá   Noun2;
+Pref+:egybe   Noun2;
+Pref+:ketté   Noun2;
+Pref+:össze   Noun2;
+Pref+:mellé   Noun2;
+Pref+:által   Noun2;
+Pref+:alul   Noun2;
+Pref+:haza   Noun2;
+Pref+:újra   Noun2;
+Pref+:abba   Noun2;
+Pref+:neki   Noun2;
+Pref+:bele   Noun2;
+Pref+:újjá   Noun2;
+Pref+:benn   Noun2;
+Pref+:fenn   Noun2;
+Pref+:fönn   Noun2;
+Pref+:jóvá   Noun2;
+Pref+:szét   Noun2;
+Pref+:tele   Noun2;
+Pref+:tova   Noun2;
+Pref+:meg   Noun2;
+Pref+:oda   Noun2;
+Pref+:elő   Noun2;
+Pref+:túl   Noun2;
+Pref+:alá   Noun2;
+Pref+:föl   Noun2;
+Pref+:ide   Noun2;
+Pref+:fel   Noun2;
+Pref+:rá   Noun2;
+Pref+:ki   Noun2;
+Pref+:le   Noun2;
+Pref+:el   Noun2;
+Pref+:át   Noun2;
+Pref+:be   Noun2;
            Noun2;

!define Cons [b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | y | z];
!define Vowel [a | á | e | é | i | í | o | ó | u | ú | ü | ű | ö | ő];
!define Root [ [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3}] | [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3} Cons^{1,4} Vowel^{0,3} ]* ] ;

! considered words
! agyar
! alj
! alkalmazott
! arany
! biztosított
! báj
! bízott
! fasírozott
! fogyt
! gally
! gondozott
! gyanúsított
! had
! haj
! halk
! halott
! has
! hatalmazott
! hibbant
! holt
! hossz
! háborodott
! háj
! hárs
! hát
! ház
! hívott
! ittjárt
! jav
! jelenvolt
! jutott
! kevesedik
! korlátozott
! kád
! károsodott
! kárvallott
! luk
! lyuk
! látott
! láz
! máj
! máz
! múlt
! nyugt
! nyáj
! nyárs
! nád
! olaj
! osztott
! ottjárt
! rokkant
! rossz
! sarj
! sav
! szarv
! szomj
! száj
! származott
! száz
! sál
! tartott
! tudott
! táj
! tál
! támogatott
! társ
! ujj
! vad
! vaj
! vas
! virágú
! vád
! vádlott
! vágott
! válogatott
! váz
! zár
! állt
! ár
! árny
! ól
! valag
LEXICON Noun2
!sudár AddNoun;
!sudár AddNounvall;
Alsószilvágy AddNoun;
Derekegyház AddNoun10;
Dombegyház AddNoun10;
Drávaegyház AddNoun10;
Fehéregyház AddNoun10;
Felsőszilvágy AddNoun;
Fityeház AddNoun10;
Fülöpház AddNoun10;
Győrsövényház AddNoun10;
Hajdúhadház AddNoun10;
Hosszúhát AddNoun;
Hosszúláz AddNoun20;
Háromház AddNoun10;
Hárságy AddNoun;
Hétház AddNoun10;
Hódoshát AddNoun;
Kisdombegyház AddNoun10;
Kövesláz AddNoun20;
LEXICON AddNoun1
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur1;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

 
LEXICON Plur1
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§ak    Gen;
                            Gen;

! raktár - raktárak, raktárok Plur
LEXICON AddNoun2
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possvall;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur2;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Plur2
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Gen;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Gen;
                            Gen;

LEXICON AddNoun
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Poss
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez13§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA2§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor              #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE11§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE11§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, önk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE11§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

LEXICON Plur
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Gen;
                            Gen;
       
LEXICON Fam
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen;
                       Gen;

LEXICON Gen
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case;
 
LEXICON Case
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez12§t      #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! val, vel
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n      #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor

LEXICON AddNounvall
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possvall;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Possvall
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez13§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA2§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor              #;    ! kor
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§AA§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE11§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE11§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, önk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE11§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

LEXICON AddNounhosszt
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Posshosszt;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plurhosszt;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Posshosszt
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez13§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA2§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor              #;    ! kor
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^t      #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE11§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE11§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE1§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fam;   ! unk, önk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE11§t§OEOE§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;
LEXICON Plurhosszt
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Gen;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez11§k    Gen;
                            Gen;

LEXICON Noun
agrárár AddNounvall;
ajakosvirágú AddNoun1;
akkusav AddNoun;
aknahossz AddNounhosszt;
alapvaj AddNounvall;
angyalszárny AddNoun;
anyagraktár AddNoun2;
anyagszertár AddNounvall;
asztalár AddNounvall;
atlétamúlt AddNoun;
autópályahossz AddNounhosszt;
beteghad AddNoun;
bibliaár AddNounvall;
bithossz AddNounhosszt;
bolhalyuk AddNoun;
bukósisakzár AddNounvall;
bukószárny AddNoun;
bázishossz AddNounhosszt;
bóraxsav AddNoun;
cicatár AddNounvall;
ciroknád AddNoun;
csemegevaj AddNoun;
cseppkőhossz AddNounhosszt;
csizmadiaár AddNounvall;
csontszárny AddNoun;
csóvahossz AddNounhosszt;
csövesvirágú AddNoun1;  ! virágúak
dalhossz AddNounhosszt;
dalár AddNounvall;
darázsszárny AddNoun;
drótzár AddNoun;
démonszáj AddNounvall;
elemhossz AddNounhosszt;
elmezár AddNoun;
energiazár AddNounvall;
etándisav AddNoun;
ezüstfavirágú AddNoun1;
farhossz AddNounhosszt;
faunakistáj AddNounvall;
fecskehad AddNoun;
fegyverraktár AddNoun2;
felkarhossz AddNounhosszt;
feszítőzár AddNoun;
flakonár AddNounvall;
folyáshossz AddNounhosszt;
forgókád AddNoun;
furathossz AddNounhosszt;
fácánszárny AddNoun;
félszáj AddNounvall;
félórahossz AddNounhosszt;
férfihalott AddNoun;
főgyökérhossz AddNounhosszt;
főnixszárny AddNoun;
fűtőanyagár AddNounvall;
glicerinsav AddNoun;
gyomorsósav AddNoun;
gyámpénztár AddNounvall;
gólyaorrvirágú AddNoun1;
görbehossz AddNounhosszt;
hadigondozott AddNoun;
hadilevéltár AddNounvall;
hangyahossz AddNounhosszt;
haszonvad AddNoun;
helynévtár AddNounvall;
hitszomj AddNoun;
huzalhossz AddNounhosszt;
háborodott AddNoun;
hírnaptár AddNounvall;
húzózár AddNoun;
hüvelyhossz AddNounhosszt;
intézményleltár AddNounvall;
istácvirágú AddNoun1;
ivóvízár AddNoun;
jelhossz AddNounhosszt;
juharvirágú AddNoun1;
játékszertár AddNounvall;
jövedelemadózott AddNoun;
kampányhossz AddNounhosszt;
kartonhossz AddNounhosszt;
kastélyszárny AddNoun;
kegytár AddNounvall;
kehelyvirágú AddNoun1;
keresztesvirágú AddNoun1;
kerékzár AddNoun;
klímaraktár AddNounvall;
klórossav AddNoun;
kocsihossz AddNounhosszt;
koronalyuk AddNoun;
kulacsalj AddNounvall;
kulcshossz AddNounhosszt;
kupakzár AddNoun;
készpénzár AddNounvall;
könyvzár AddNoun;
kötélhossz AddNounhosszt;
köznyáj AddNounvall;
közraktár AddNoun2;
lapáthossz AddNounhosszt;
levéltár AddNounvall;
leányhad AddNoun;
lábfejhossz AddNounhosszt;
léchossz AddNounhosszt;
lövedékhossz AddNounhosszt;
lövészzászlóalj AddNounvall;
lőporraktár AddNoun2;
macskaárny AddNoun;
mellhossz AddNounhosszt;
menedzsernaptár AddNounvall;
mintahossz AddNounhosszt;
mosott AddNoun;
munkadarabtár AddNounvall;
mérőhossz AddNounhosszt;
műtáj AddNounvall;
nyelvesvirágú AddNoun1; ! virágúak
nyelvhát AddNoun;
nyomathossz AddNounhosszt;
nyúlól AddNounvall;
orrhossz AddNounhosszt;
orrésszárny AddNoun;
pamutsál AddNounvall;
paraméterhossz AddNounhosszt;
peronhossz AddNounhosszt;
pillangózár AddNoun;
plafonár AddNounvall;
profilhossz AddNounhosszt;
pálcikaujj AddNounvall;
párosult AddNoun;
pórázhossz AddNounhosszt;
raktár AddNoun2;
reklámár AddNounvall;
rontásvád AddNoun;
rossz AddNounhosszt;
rétegadattár AddNounvall;
rönkhossz AddNounhosszt;
segédzár AddNoun;
sokvirágú AddNoun1;
soralj AddNounvall;
sorhossz AddNounhosszt;
szalaghossz AddNounhosszt;
szelepzár AddNounvall;
szellemszárny AddNoun;
szemhossz AddNounhosszt;
szoknyaalj AddNounvall;
szondahossz AddNounhosszt;
száz AddNoun;
szóhossz AddNounhosszt;
szökőár AddNounvall;
talphossz AddNounhosszt;
tananyagár AddNounvall;
tanítványhad AddNoun;
templomszáj AddNounvall;
termékhossz AddNounhosszt;
tomportáj AddNounvall;
transzportált AddNoun;
távcsőhossz AddNounhosszt;
távcsőár AddNounvall;
tücsöklyuk AddNoun;
tűoltószertár AddNounvall;
uborkahossz AddNounhosszt;
vektorhossz AddNounhosszt;
ventilátorszárny AddNoun;
ventilátortár AddNounvall;
virágú AddNoun1;  ! virágúak
vonathossz AddNounhosszt;
válltáj AddNounvall;
vérvád AddNoun;
wertheimzár AddNounvall;
zsákhossz AddNounhosszt;
állónaptár AddNounvall;
áruraktár AddNoun2;
életszomj AddNoun;
értesítőtár AddNounvall;
ösvényhossz AddNounhosszt;
üdítősav AddNoun;
üvegalj AddNounvall;
